Tennessee, session 114, SB1450.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Chapter 7 of the Private Acts of 1999, as amended by Chapter 37 of the
Private Acts of 2014, and any other acts amendatory thereto, is amended in Section 12 by
deleting the second paragraph, which reads:
The board of Mayor and Aldermen shall, within a period of thirty (30) days from
the date on which a vacancy was declared, appoint a qualified person to fill the vacancy
for the unexpired term of the vacated seat.
and by substituting:
If there is a vacancy declared for an office of Alderman, the board of Mayor and
Aldermen shall within sixty (60) days thereafter appoint a qualified person to
serve the unexpired term of such office.
SECTION 2. Chapter 7 of the Private Acts of 1999, and any other acts amendatory
thereto, is amended in Section 16 by deleting subdivision 3 and substituting:
3. May make temporary appointments to the offices of City Attorney or City
Judge in case of sickness, absence, or other temporary disability, which shall be
effective until confirmed or rejected by the Board.
SECTION 3. Chapter 7 of the Private Acts of 1999, and any other acts amendatory
thereto, is amended in Section 16 by deleting subdivision 7 and substituting:
7. Shall execute all contracts approved by the Board; otherwise, the Mayor shall
have authority to execute any contract that does not exceed ten thousand dollars
SB1450
003731
- 1 -

($10,000), and does not by its terms require approval of the Board, provided any
expenditures pursuant to such contract are within the budget.
SECTION 4. Chapter 7 of the Private Acts of 1999, as amended by Chapter 24 of the
Private Acts of 2009, and any other acts amendatory thereto, is amended in Section 16,
subdivision 8, by deleting the language "and City Recorder,".
SECTION 5. Chapter 7 of the Private Acts of 1999, and any other acts amendatory
thereto, is amended by deleting Section 22.
SECTION 6. Chapter 7 of the Private Acts of 1999, and any other acts amendatory
thereto, is amended in Section 25 by deleting the word "his" and by substituting instead the
word "this" in the first sentence.
SECTION 7. Chapter 7 of the Private Acts of 1999, and any other acts amendatory
thereto, is amended in Section 33 by deleting the section and substituting:
Sale of Property. The Mayor may sell surplus property of the City; provided,
however, the sale of surplus property with a fair market value of more than two
thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), or the sale of any real property, shall be
subject to Board approval.
SECTION 8. Chapter 7 of the Private Acts of 1999, and any other acts amendatory
thereto, is amended in Section 40 by deleting the section and substituting:
Disbursements. Disbursements shall be made only as authorized by the Mayor,
City Treasurer, Vice-Mayor, or the designee of such officers.
SECTION 9. Nothing in this act shall be construed to remove any incumbent from office
or abridge the term of any incumbent prior to the end of the term for which such elected official
was selected, as prescribed in Article XI, Section 9 of the Constitution of the State of
Tennessee.
SECTION 10. This act shall have no effect unless it is approved by a two-thirds (2/3)
vote of the legislative body of the City of Milan. Its approval or nonapproval shall be proclaimed
by the presiding officer of the legislative body and certified to the secretary of state.
- 2 - 003731

SECTION 11. For the purpose of approving or rejecting the provisions of this act, it shall
be effective upon becoming law, the public welfare requiring it. For all other purposes, it shall
become effective as provided in the preceding Section 10.
- 3 - 003731